vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Trượt băng nghệ thuật và khúc côn cầu > Giày trượt băng > Giày trượt băng tốc độ: Giày trượt băng tốc độ vòng dài; Giày trượt băng tốc độ vòng ngắn
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Műkorcsolya és jégkorong > Jégkorcsolyák > Gyorskorcsolyák: Nagypályás gyorskorcsolyák; Rövidpályás gyorskorcsolyák
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Patinação artística e hóquei > Patins para gelo > Patins de gelo para velocidade: Patins de gelo de velocidade em pista longa; Patins de gelo de velocidade em pista curta
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用品 > アイススケート靴 > スピードアイススケート靴: ロングトラックスピードスケート靴; ショートトラックスピードスケート靴
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Umjetničko klizanje i hokej > Klizaljke > Klizaljke za brzo klizanje: Klizaljke za brze duge staze; Klizaljke za brze kratke staze
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Krasokorčuľovanie a hokej > Korčule > Korčule na rýchlokorčuľovanie: Korčule na rýchlokorčuľovanie; Korčule na rýchlokorčuľovanie na krátke trate
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Kunstskøjteløb og ishockey > Isskøjter > Speedskøjter: Long track-hurtigløbsskøjter; Short track-hurtigløbsskøjter
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球 > 冰刀鞋 > 高速溜冰鞋: 長道競速滑冰鞋; 短道競速滑冰鞋
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Eiskunstlauf & Hockey > Schlittschuhe > Schnelllauf-Schlittschuhe: Eisschnelllauf-Schlittschuhe; Shorttrack-Schlittschuhe
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Хоккей и фигурное катание > Коньки > Беговые коньки: Конькобежные коньки; Коньки для шорт-трека
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Фигурно пързаляне и хокей > Кънки за лед > Скоростни кънки за лед: Скоростни кънки за дълга писта; Скоростни кънки за шорттрек
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Hóquei e patinagem artística > Patins de gelo > Patins de gelo para velocidade: Patins de velocidade em pista longa; Patins de velocidade em pista curta
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Krasobruslení a hokej > Brusle > Rychlobruslařské brusle: Rychlobruslařské brusle na dlouhou dráhu; Rychlobruslařské brusle na short track
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Umetnostno drsanje in hokej > Drsalke > Drsalke za hitrostno drsanje: Drsalke za hitrostno drsanje z dolgim rezilom; Drsalke za hitrostno drsanje za kratke proge
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Taitoluistelu ja jääkiekko > Luistimet > Nopeusluistimet: Pikaluistimet; Kaukalopikaluistimet
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Pattinaggio di figura e hockey > Pattini da ghiaccio > Pattini da ghiaccio di velocità: Pattini da ghiaccio per pista lunga; Pattini da ghiaccio per short track
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Kunstrijden en ijshockey > Schaatsen > Snelheidsschaatsen: Langebaanschaatsen; Shorttrackschaatsen
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Kunstløp og hockey > Skøyter > Hastighetsskøyter: Hurtigløpsskøyter for langbane; Hurtigløpsskøyter for kortbane
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 피겨 스케이팅/하키 > 스케이트화 > 스피드 스케이트화: 롱트랙 스피드 아이스 스케이트; 쇼트트랙 스피드 아이스 스케이트
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Figure Skating & Hockey > Ice Skates > Speed Ice Skates: Long Track Speed Ice Skates; Short Track Speed Ice Skates
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 花样滑冰与冰球 > 溜冰鞋 > 速滑溜冰鞋: 长道速滑冰鞋; 短道速滑冰鞋
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Artistik Paten ve Hokey > Buz Patenleri > Hız Buz Patenleri: Uzun kulvar hız patenleri; Kısa kulvar hız patenleri
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Patinaje artístico y hockey > Patines de hielo > Patines de hielo de velocidad: Patines de velocidad sobre hielo en pista larga; Patines de velocidad sobre hielo en pista corta
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Dailusis čiuožimas ir ledo ritulys > Pačiūžos > Greitojo čiuožimo pačiūžos: Ilgojo tako greitojo čiuožimo pačiūžos; Trumpojo tako greitojo čiuožimo pačiūžos
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Patinaj artistic și hochei > Patine pentru patinaj pe gheață > Patine pentru patinaj viteză: Patine de viteză pentru pistă lungă; Patine de viteză pentru pistă scurtă
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Konståkning och hockey > Skridskor > Hastighetsskridskor: Hastighetsskridskor för långbana; Short track-skridskor
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Patinage artistique et hockey > Patins à glace > Patins à glace de vitesse: Patins de vitesse sur longue piste; Patins de vitesse sur courte piste
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Łyżwiarstwo figurowe i hokej > Łyżwy > Panczeny: Łyżwy do jazdy szybkiej na długim torze; Łyżwy do short tracku
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Καλλιτεχνικό πατινάζ & χόκεϊ > Παγοπέδιλα > Παγοπέδιλα ταχύτητας: Παγοπέδιλα ταχύτητας long track; Παγοπέδιλα ταχύτητας short track
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > สเกตลีลาและฮอกกี้ > สเกตน้ำแข็ง > สเก็ตน้ำแข็งแบบเร็ว: รองเท้าสปีดสเกตน้ำแข็งระยะยาว; รองเท้าสปีดสเกตน้ำแข็งระยะสั้น